North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159G. Water Infrastructure.
Article 2. Water Infrastructure Loans and Grants Administered by Department.
§ 159G-39.
Review of applications and award of loan or grant.

Point Assignment. — The Division of Water Infrastructure must review all applications filed for a loan or grant under this Article for an application period. The Division must rank each application in accordance with the points assigned to the evaluation criteria. The Division must make a written determination of an application’s rank and attach the determination to the application for the Authority’s review. The Authority must consider the Division’s determination of rank when the Authority determines an application’s rank. The Authority’s determination of rank is conclusive.

Initial Consideration. — The Division may consider an application for an emergency loan from the Wastewater Reserve or the Drinking Water Reserve at any time. The Division must consider all other loan applications and all grant applications filed during an application period at the same time in order to rank the applications. The Division shall forward all applications received for the application period to the State Water Infrastructure Authority.

Reconsideration. — When the Authority determines an application’s rank is too low to receive an award of a loan or grant for an application period, the Division must include the application with those considered for the next application period. If the application’s rank is again too low to receive an award, the application is not eligible for consideration in a subsequent application period. An applicant whose application does not receive an award after review in two application periods may file a new application.

Notification of Decision. — When the Authority determines that an application’s rank makes it eligible for an award of a loan or grant, the Division must send the applicant a letter of intent to award the loan or grant. The notice must set out any conditions the applicant must meet to receive an award of a loan or grant. When the applicant satisfies the conditions set out in the letter of intent, the Division must send the applicant an offer to award a loan or grant. The applicant must give the Division written notice of whether it accepts or rejects the offer. A loan or grant is considered awarded when an offer to award the loan or grant is issued.

Viable Utility Reserve Approval. — The Department shall not award a grant from the Viable Utility Reserve Fund unless the Local Government Commission approves the award of the grant and the terms of the grant. Any emergency grant application submitted under

G.S. 159G-31(e)

shall be deemed approved by the Local Government Commission upon submission.

Grant Terms. —

Viable Utility Reserve. — The Department and the Local Government Commission may, in their discretion, impose specific performance measures or conditions on any grant awarded from the Viable Utility Reserve, including any grant submitted under

G.S. 159G-31(e)

.

Drinking Water Reserve or Wastewater Reserve. — The Department may impose specific performance measures or conditions on any grant awarded from the Drinking Water Reserve or Wastewater Reserve to ensure an adequately funded program for the repair, maintenance, and management of the water or wastewater infrastructure.”

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 13.3(nnn); 2013-360, s. 14.21(k); 2013-413, s. 57(w); 2014-115, s. 17; 2020-79, s. 1(j); 2021-180, s. 12.12(b).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 14.21(o), provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes may conform names and titles changed by this section and may correct statutory references as required by this section throughout the General Statutes.” Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes made conforming changes in this section.

Session Laws
2014-100, s. 14.16, provides: “The Department of Environment and Natural Resources, Division of Water Infrastructure, and the State Water Infrastructure Authority shall give priority to loan and grant applications received from any local government meeting all of the following criteria:

“(1) The local government is located in a development tier one area.

“(2) The application seeks funding for a project that is required to be completed due to an EPA administrative order.

“(3) The application is deemed complete by the Division and meets the minimum requirements for the program from which it is seeking funding.”

Session Laws
2014-100, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2014.’ ”

Session Laws
2014-100, s. 38.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2014-2015 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2014-2015 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2014-100, s. 38.7, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(nnn), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Division of Water Resources” for “Division of Environmental Health” in the second sentence of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(k), effective July 1, 2013, in subsection (a), substituted “Infrastructure” for “Quality or the Division of Water Resources, as appropriate” in the first sentence and substituted “application for the Authority’s review” for “application. The Division’s determination of rank is conclusive,” and added the last two sentences; added the last sentence in subsection (b); inserted “the Authority determines” in the first sentence of subsection (c); and substituted “Authority” for “Division” in the first sentence of subsection (d).

Session Laws 2013-413, s. 57(w), substituted “Division of Water Resources” for “Division of Water Quality or the Division of Water Resources, as appropriate” in the first sentence in subsection (a). For effective date, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2020-79, s. 1(j), effective July 1, 2020, added subsection (e).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 12.12(b), effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (e), substituted “Approval” for “Terms”; and added subsection (f).

§ 159G-40.
Terms of loan and execution of loan documents.

Approval by Local Government Commission. — The Department may not award a loan under this Article unless the Local Government Commission approves the award of the loan and the terms of the loan. The terms of a loan awarded from the CWSRF and the DWSRF must be consistent with federal law. In reviewing a proposed loan to a local government unit, the Local Government Commission must consider the loan as if it were a bond proposal and review the proposed loan in accordance with the factors set out in

G.S. 159-52

for review of a proposed bond issue. The Local Government Commission must review a proposed loan to a nonprofit water corporation and to an investor-owned drinking water corporation in accordance with the factors set out in

G.S. 159-153

.

Interest Rate and Maturity. — The interest rate payable on and the maximum maturity of a loan are subject to the following limitations:

Interest rate. — The interest rate for a loan may not exceed the lesser of four percent (4%) or one half the prevailing national market rate for tax-exempt general obligation debt of similar maturities derived from a published indicator. When recommended by the Department, the Local Government Commission may set an interest rate for a loan for a targeted interest rate project at a rate that is lower than the standard rate to achieve the purpose of the target.

Maturity. — The maximum maturity for a loan for a project that is not a targeted interest rate project is 20 years or the project’s expected life, whichever is shorter. The maximum maturity for a loan for a targeted interest rate project is 30 years or the project’s expected life, whichever is shorter.

Security for Loan. — A local government unit may pledge any of the following, alone or in combination, as security for an obligation to repay the principal of and interest on a loan awarded under this Article:

User fee revenues derived from operation of the wastewater system or public water system that benefits from the project for which the loan is awarded.

A mortgage, deed of trust, security interest, or similar lien on part or all of the real and personal property comprising the wastewater system or public water system that benefits from the project for which the loan is awarded.

Its full faith and credit if it meets the requirements of Article 4 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes.

Nontax revenue not included in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Debt Instrument. — A local government unit, a nonprofit water corporation, and an investor-owned drinking water corporation may execute a debt instrument payable to the State to evidence an obligation to repay the principal of and interest on a loan awarded under this Article. The Treasurer, with the assistance of the Local Government Commission, must develop debt instruments for use by local government units, nonprofit water corporations, and investor-owned drinking water corporations under this section. The Local Government Commission must develop procedures for loan recipients to deliver debt instruments to the State without public bidding.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 13.11A(c); 2015-207, s. 4(a); 2016-94, s. 14.23(a), (b).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2015-207, s. 4(b), as amended by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.23(b), provides: “This section is effective when it becomes law [August 11, 2015] and expires October 1, 2016. The sunset does not affect the validity of any loan agreement approved by the Local Government Commission prior to the sunset or loan increases approved after the sunset, provided the loan was approved in accordance with

G.S. 159G-40

, as amended by this section, prior to the sunset.”

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2016.’ ”

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 39.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.11A(c), effective July 1, 2011, in the last sentence of subsection (a), inserted “and to an investor-owned drinking water corporation”; and in subsection (d), in the second sentence, substituted “local government unit, a nonprofit water corporation, and an investor-owned drinking water corporation” for “local government unit and a nonprofit water corporation,” and in the third sentence, substituted “local government units, nonprofit water coporations, and investor-owned drinking water corporations” for “local government units and nonprofit water corporations.”

Session Laws 2015-207, s. 4(a), rewrote subdivision (b)(2). For effective date and sunset provision, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.23(a), effective October 1, 2016, in subdivision (b)(2), substituted “targeted interest rate project is” for “high-unit-cost project may not exceed” in the first sentence, and substituted “targeted interest rate project” for “high-unit-cost project” in the second sentence.

§ 159G-41.
Withdrawal of loan or grant.

A letter of intent to offer an award for a loan or grant for a project is withdrawn if the applicant fails to enter into a construction contract for the project within two years after the date of the letter, unless the Department finds that the applicant has good cause for the failure. An award for a loan or grant for a project is withdrawn if the applicant fails to enter into a construction contract for the project within one year after the date of the award, unless the Department finds that the applicant has good cause for the failure. If the Department finds good cause for an applicant’s failure, the Department must set a date by which the applicant must take action or forfeit the loan or grant.

History.

2005-454, s. 3.

§ 159G-42.
Disbursement of loan or grant.

The Department must disburse the proceeds of a loan or grant to a recipient in a series of payments based on the progress of the project for which the loan or grant was awarded. To obtain a payment, a loan or grant recipient must submit a request for payment to the Department and document the expenditures for which the payment is requested.

History.

2005-454, s. 3.

§ 159G-43.
Inspection of project.

Authority. — The Department may inspect a project for which it awards a loan or grant under this Article to determine the progress made on the project and whether the construction of the project is consistent with the project described in the loan or grant application. The inspection may be performed by personnel of the Department or by a professional engineer licensed under Chapter 89C of the General Statutes.

Disqualification. — An individual may not perform an inspection of a project under this section if the individual meets any of the following criteria:

Is an officer or employee of the local government unit, nonprofit water corporation, or investor-owned drinking water corporation that received the loan or grant award for the project.

Is an owner, officer, employee, or agent of a contractor or subcontractor engaged in the construction of the project for which the loan or grant was made.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 13.11A(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.11A(d), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “local government unit, nonprofit water corporation, or investor-owned drinking water corporation” for “local government unit or nonprofit water corporation” in subdivision (b)(1).

§ 159G-44.
Rules.

The Department may adopt rules to implement this Chapter. Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Administrative Procedure Act, governs the adoption of rules by the Department. A rule adopted to administer a loan or grant from the CWSRF or the DWSRF must be consistent with federal law. The Department must give a copy of the rules adopted to implement this Article without charge to a person who requests a copy.

History.

2005-454, s. 3.

§ 159G-45.
Assessment of local government units; assistance.

The Authority and the Local Government Commission shall develop criteria to determine how local government units should be assessed and reviewed in accordance with this section, and these criteria shall address at least all of the following:

Whether the public water or wastewater system serves less than 10,000 customers.

Whether the public water or wastewater system has an established, operational, and adequately funded program for its repair, maintenance, and management.

Whether the annual debt service is disproportionate to the public water or wastewater system’s annual revenue.

Whether the local government unit has appropriated funds from its utility or public service enterprise fund in accordance with G.S. 159-13(b)(14) in two or more of the preceding five fiscal years without maintaining a reserve fund sufficient to provide for operating expenses, capital outlay, and debt service.

Whether the local government unit has appropriated funds to supplement the operating expenses, capital outlay, or debt service on outstanding utility or enterprise bonds or notes in excess of the user fees collected in two or more of the preceding five fiscal years.

Utilizing the assessment and review process, the Authority and Local Government Commission shall identify distressed units. Each distressed unit identified under this subsection shall do all of the following:

Conduct an asset assessment and rate study, as directed and approved by the Authority and the Local Government Commission.

Participate in a training and educational program approved by the Authority and the Local Government Commission for that distressed unit. Attendance shall be mandatory for any governing board members and staff whose participation is required by the Authority and Local Government Commission. The scope of training and education, and its method of delivery, shall be at the discretion of the Authority and Local Government Commission.

Develop an action plan, taking into consideration all of the following:

A short-term and a long-term plan for infrastructure repair, maintenance, and management.

Continuing education of the governing board and system operating staff.

Long-term financial management to ensure the public water system or wastewater system will generate sufficient revenue to adequately fund management and operations, personnel, appropriate levels of maintenance, and reinvestment that facilitate the provision of reliable water or wastewater services.

Any other matters identified by the Authority or the Local Government Commission.

Once an identified distressed unit has completed all of the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, that unit shall no longer be identified as a distressed unit for the remainder of that assessment and review cycle.

The Authority and the Local Government Commission shall establish the frequency of the cycle for assessment and review of local government units under this section. The frequency of the cycle shall be not less than once every two years.

History.

2020-79, s. 1(k); 2021-180, s. 12.12(c).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2020-79, s. 14, made this section effective July 1, 2020.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 12.12(c), effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (d), substituted “section. The frequency of the cycle shall be not less than once every two years” for “section, which shall be no less than every two years.”

§§ 159G-46 through 159G-50.

Reserved for future codification purposes.